Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 4, section 105, is amended to read: Sec. 105. WATER-USE PERMITS; CITY OF LAKE ELMO. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of natural resources deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end : (1) issue permits necessary for the city of Lake Elmo to construct and operate deleted text begin adeleted text end new municipal water supply deleted text begin welldeleted text end new text begin wellsnew text end ; and (2) amend existing water-use permits issued to the city of Lake Elmo to increase the authorized volume of water that may be appropriated under the permits to a level consistent with the amount anticipated to be needed each year according to a water supply plan approved by the commissioner under Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.291. deleted text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), all new and amended water-use permits issued by the commissioner to the city of Lake Elmo must contain the same water-use conservation and planning measures required by law for municipal wells located wholly or partially within the five-mile radius of White Bear Lake. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) This section expires June 30, 2027. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end